Florida, session 2026, SB1136.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (a) through (f) of subsection 17 (2) of section 381.0056, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 18 paragraphs (b) through (g), respectively, a new paragraph (a) is 19 added to that subsection, and paragraph (g) of subsection (5) 20 and paragraph (e) of subsection (6) of that section are amended, 21 to read: 22 381.0056âSchool health services program.â 23 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 24 (a)ââDental screeningâ means a limited, noninvasive visual 25 inspection of the mouth and oral cavity for the purpose of 26 identifying obvious signs of dental disease or abnormality. The 27 term does not include the diagnosis or treatment of a dental 28 disease or abnormality or the use of instruments that penetrate 29 tissue, and may not be construed as a comprehensive dental 30 examination. A dental screening is not an invasive screening as 31 defined in paragraph (d). 32 (5)âA nonpublic school may request to participate in the 33 school health services program. A nonpublic school voluntarily 34 participating in the school health services program shall: 35 (g)âAt the beginning of each school year, inform parents or 36 guardians in writing that their children who are students in the 37 school will receive specified health services as provided for in 38 the district health services plan. A student will be exempt from 39 any of these services if his or her parent or guardian requests 40 such exemption in writing. A dental screening that is part of 41 the preventive dental program required under subparagraph 42 (4)(a)5. may be provided to a student after the written notice 43 required by this paragraph and a reasonable opportunity for the 44 parent or guardian to request such exemption in writing. This 45 paragraph may shall not be construed to authorize invasive 46 screening; if there is a need for such procedure, the consent of 47 the studentâs parent or guardian must shall be obtained in 48 writing before prior to performing the screening. However, the 49 laws and rules relating to contagious or communicable diseases 50 and sanitary matters may shall not be violated. 51 (6)âThe district school board shall: 52 (e)âAt the beginning of each school year, inform parents or 53 guardians in writing that their children who are students in the 54 district schools will receive specified health services as 55 provided for in the district health services plan. A student 56 will be exempt from any of these services if his or her parent 57 or guardian requests such exemption in writing. A dental 58 screening that is part of the preventive dental program required 59 under subparagraph (4)(a)5. may be provided to a student after 60 the written notice required by this paragraph and a reasonable 61 opportunity for the parent or guardian to request such exemption 62 in writing. This paragraph may shall not be construed to 63 authorize invasive screening; if there is a need for such 64 procedure, the consent of the studentâs parent or guardian must 65 shall be obtained in writing before prior to performing the 66 screening. However, the laws and rules relating to contagious or 67 communicable diseases and sanitary matters may shall not be 68 violated. 69 Section 2.âParagraph (c) of subsection (8) of section 70 1001.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 71 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 72 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 73 powers and perform all duties listed below: 74 (8)âSTUDENT WELFARE.â 75 (c)1.âIn accordance with the rights of parents enumerated 76 in ss. 1002.20 and 1014.04, adopt procedures for notifying a 77 studentâs parent if there is a change in the studentâs services 78 or monitoring related to the studentâs mental, emotional, or 79 physical health or well-being and the schoolâs ability to 80 provide a safe and supportive learning environment for the 81 student. The procedures must reinforce the fundamental right of 82 parents to make decisions regarding the upbringing and control 83 of their children by requiring school district personnel to 84 encourage a student to discuss issues relating to his or her 85 well-being with his or her parent or to facilitate discussion of 86 the issue with the parent. The procedures may not prohibit 87 parents from accessing any of their studentâs education and 88 health records created, maintained, or used by the school 89 district, as required by s. 1002.22(2). 90 2.âA school district may not adopt procedures or student 91 support forms that prohibit school district personnel from 92 notifying a parent about his or her studentâs mental, emotional, 93 or physical health or well-being, or a change in related 94 services or monitoring, or that encourage or have the effect of 95 encouraging a student to withhold from a parent such 96 information. School district personnel may not discourage or 97 prohibit parental notification of and involvement in critical 98 decisions affecting a studentâs mental, emotional, or physical 99 health or well-being. This subparagraph does not prohibit a 100 school district from adopting procedures that permit school 101 personnel to withhold such information from a parent if a 102 reasonably prudent person would believe that disclosure would 103 result in abuse, abandonment, or neglect, as those terms are 104 defined in s. 39.01. 105 3.âClassroom instruction by school personnel or third 106 parties on sexual orientation or gender identity may not occur 107 in prekindergarten through grade 8, except when required by ss. 108 1003.42(2)(o)3. and 1003.46. If such instruction is provided in 109 grades 9 through 12, the instruction must be age-appropriate or 110 developmentally appropriate for students in accordance with 111 state standards. This subparagraph applies to charter schools. 112 4.âStudent support services training developed or provided 113 by a school district to school district personnel must adhere to 114 student services guidelines, standards, and frameworks 115 established by the Department of Education. 116 5.âAt the beginning of the school year, each school 117 district shall notify parents of each health care service 118 offered at their studentâs school and the option to withhold 119 consent or decline any specific service in accordance with s. 120 1014.06. A dental screening, as defined in s. 381.0056, which is 121 included in the preventive dental program listed in s. 122 381.0056(4)(a)5. may be provided in accordance with s. 381.0056. 123 Parental consent to a health care service does not waive the 124 parentâs right to access his or her studentâs educational or 125 health records or to be notified about a change in his or her 126 studentâs services or monitoring as provided by this paragraph. 127 6.âBefore administering a student well-being questionnaire 128 or health screening form to a student in kindergarten through 129 grade 3, the school district must provide the questionnaire or 130 health screening form to the parent and obtain the permission of 131 the parent. 132 7.âEach school district shall adopt procedures for a parent 133 to notify the principal, or his or her designee, regarding 134 concerns under this paragraph at his or her studentâs school and 135 the process for resolving those concerns within 7 calendar days 136 after notification by the parent. 137 a.âAt a minimum, the procedures must require that within 30 138 days after notification by the parent that the concern remains 139 unresolved, the school district must either resolve the concern 140 or provide a statement of the reasons for not resolving the 141 concern. 142 b.âIf a concern is not resolved by the school district, a 143 parent may: 144 (I)âRequest the Commissioner of Education to appoint a 145 special magistrate who is a member of The Florida Bar in good 146 standing and who has at least 5 yearsâ experience in 147 administrative law. The special magistrate shall determine facts 148 relating to the dispute over the school district procedure or 149 practice, consider information provided by the school district, 150 and render a recommended decision for resolution to the State 151 Board of Education within 30 days after receipt of the request 152 by the parent. The State Board of Education must approve or 153 reject the recommended decision at its next regularly scheduled 154 meeting that is more than 7 calendar days and no more than 30 155 days after the date the recommended decision is transmitted. The 156 costs of the special magistrate shall be borne by the school 157 district. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules, 158 including forms, necessary to implement this subparagraph. 159 (II)âBring an action against the school district to obtain 160 a declaratory judgment that the school district procedure or 161 practice violates this paragraph and seek injunctive relief. A 162 court may award damages and shall award reasonable attorney fees 163 and court costs to a parent who receives declaratory or 164 injunctive relief. 165 c.âEach school district shall adopt and post on its website 166 policies to notify parents of the procedures required under this 167 subparagraph. 168 d.âNothing contained in this subparagraph shall be 169 construed to abridge or alter rights of action or remedies in 170 equity already existing under the common law or general law. 171 Section 3.âPresent subsection (5) of section 1014.06, 172 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (6), and a new 173 subsection (5) is added to that section, to read: 174 1014.06âParental consent for health care services.â 175 (5)âThis section does not apply to a dental screening, as 176 defined in s. 381.0056(2)(a), which is part of the preventive 177 dental program required under s. 381.0056(4)(a)5. and provided 178 in accordance with s. 381.0056. 179 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.